Utah statutes.
34-38-13.   Confidentiality of test-related information.

(1)  For purposes of this section, "test-related information" means the following received by the employer through the employer's drug or alcohol testing program:

(a)  information;

(b)  interviews;

(c)  reports;

(d)  statements;

(e)  memoranda; or

(f)  test results.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsections (3) and (6), test-related information is a confidential communication and may not be:

(a)  used or received in evidence;

(b)  obtained in discovery; or

(c)  disclosed in any public or private proceeding.

(3)  Test-related information:

(a)  shall be disclosed to the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing:

(i)  in the manner provided in Subsection 58-13-5(3); and

(ii)  only to the extent required under Subsection 58-13-5(3); and

(b)  may only be used in a proceeding related to:

(i)  an action taken by the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing under Section 58-1-401 when the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing is taking action in whole or in part on the basis of test-related information disclosed under Subsection (3)(a);

(ii)  an action taken by an employer under Section 34-38-8; or

(iii)  an action under Section 34-38-11.

(4)  Test-related information shall be the property of the employer.

(5)  An employer is entitled to use a drug or alcohol test result as a basis for action under Section 34-38-8.

(6)  An employer may not be examined as a witness with regard to test-related information, except:

(a)  in a proceeding related to an action taken by the employer under Section 34-38-8;

(b)  in an action under Section 34-38-11; or

(c)  in an action described in Subsection (3)(b)(i).



Amended by Chapter 152, 2004 General Session

